Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3102
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Psychology Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-3103 to 38-3110 apply.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 63;

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1036.